Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 6. Sales on Execution

Cross references. —

As to sale of goods and chattels on execution generally, see §§

1-17-312

to

1-17-314

.

§ 1-21-601.
Notice of sale.

The officer having levied
upon goods and chattels by virtue of an execution shall without delay
give public notice by advertisement in a newspaper published or widely
circulated in the county where the property is to be sold. The notice
shall state the time and place of sale, describe the goods and chattels,
and shall be published at least ten (10) days before the day of sale.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 103; R.S. 1887, § 3519; R.S. 1899, § 4431; C.S. 1910, § 5294; C.S. 1920, § 6566; R.S. 1931, § 62-1501; C.S. 1945, § 14-1001; W.S. 1957, § 1-658; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-601.

§ 1-21-602.
Manner
of conducting sale; return.

At the time appointed,
the officer shall expose the goods and chattels to public sale and
sell them to the highest bidder. If there are no bidders or only a
single bid is given, the sale shall be adjourned from time to time
until a fair sale is had. The officer shall return the execution together
with the money to the judge at the time of making the return.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 104; R.S. 1887, § 3520; R.S. 1899, § 4432; C.S. 1910, § 5295; C.S. 1920, § 6567; R.S. 1931, § 62-1502; C.S. 1945, § 14-1002; W.S. 1957, § 1-659; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-602; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-603.
Officer not to purchase.

No officer shall directly
or indirectly purchase any goods and chattels at any sale made by
him upon execution. Every such sale shall be absolutely void.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 105; R.S. 1887, § 3521; R.S. 1899, § 4433; C.S. 1910, § 5296; C.S. 1920, § 6568; R.S. 1931, § 62-1503; C.S. 1945, § 14-1003; W.S. 1957, § 1-660; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-603.